Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.080

Duties of LEAP administration.

To carry out the provisions of RCW 44.48.070 the LEAP administration shall provide for:

(1) Automated databases and application systems in support of legislative requirements to monitor, evaluate, analyze, report, and review;

(2) Maintenance of computer software, application programs, databases, and related documentation;

(3) Education, training, and programming services;

(4) Procedural documentation support; and

(5) Consulting assistance on special projects.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 8.]